Utah statutes.
62A-5-308.   Commitment -- Persons under age 18.

Beginning July 1, 1993, the director of the division or the director's designee, may commit an individual under 18 years of age who has an intellectual disability or symptoms of an intellectual disability, to the division for observation, diagnosis, care, and treatment if that commitment is based on:

(1)  involuntary commitment under the provisions of Section 62A-5-312.  Proceedings for involuntary commitment of an individual under 18 years of age may be commenced by filing a written petition with the juvenile court under Section 62A-5-312.  The juvenile court has jurisdiction to proceed in the same manner and with the same authority as the district court; or

(2)  an emergency commitment in accordance with the provisions of Section 62A-5-311.

